Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 327.269, as amended by section  20, chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, is
amended to read:
327.269. (1) The Early Learning Account is established within the Fund for Student Success.
(2) The Early Learning Account shall consist of:
(a) Moneys transferred from the Fund for Student Success under ORS 327.001;
(b) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the account by the Legislative Assembly;
(c) Amounts donated to the account; and
(d) Other amounts deposited into the account from any source.
(3) The Department of Education or the Department  of Early Learning and Care, on behalf of
the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts, grants, donations and other  moneys from public
and private sources for the Early Learning Account. Moneys received as  provided in this subsection
shall be deposited into the Early Learning Account.
(4) Moneys in the Early Learning Account are continuously appropriated to :
(a) The Department of Education for early childhood special education or early intervention
services, as provided by ORS 343.475;  and
(b) The Department of Early Learning  and Care for early learning programs, as described
in ORS 327.274.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 327.274, as amended  by section 21, chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, and sec-
tion 30, chapter 27, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
327.274. (1) The Department of Education shall  use moneys in the Early Learning Account
to provide funding for early childhood special education or early intervention services, as
provided by ORS 343.475.
(2) The Department of  Early Learning and Care shall use moneys in the Early Learning Ac-
count to provide funding for early learning programs in a manner  consistent with a statewide early
learning system plan overseen by the Early Learning Council.  Early learning programs [ that may
receive] for which the department may use  moneys from the Early Learning Account include:
[(a) Early childhood special education or early  intervention services, as provided by ORS
343.475;]
[(b)] (a) Relief nurseries;
[(c)] (b) Programs funded by the Early Childhood Equity Fund;
Enrolled Senate Bill 427 (SB 427-INTRO) Page 1
[(d)] (c) The Oregon prekindergarten program and other public preschool  programs established
under ORS 329.170 to 329.200, by increasing:
(A) The total number of spaces for children served by the programs; or
(B) Existing spaces for full-day programs from half-day programs;
[(e)] (d) Professional development for early childhood educators; and
[(f)] (e) Early Head Start programs.
[(2)] (3) In addition to the uses identified in subsection [ (1)] (2) of this section, the Department
of Early Learning and Care may use  moneys in the Early Learning Account [ may be used ] for:
(a) [ Staffing needs ] Administrative, operational or  program needs, including staffing,  of the
Department of Early Learning and Care for the purpose of implementing this section.
(b) Costs incurred by the Department of Early Learning and Care  in conducting  the biennial
evaluation of programs that receive grants under ORS 417.782.
[(3)] (4) The Early  Learning Council shall adopt rules necessary for the distribution of moneys
under this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) The  Department of Early Learning and Care shall disburse and expend
moneys in a  manner that is consistent with the intended purposes for which the moneys
were appropriated or allocated to the department.
(2) If moneys are appropriated or allocated to the  department and provisions for the in-
tended disbursement or expenditure of the moneys are not provided in statute, in agreement
or by any other means related to the appropriation or allocation, the department may dis-
burse or expend the moneys in the manner the department  determines is most consistent
with the intended purposes  for which the moneys were appropriated or allocated, including
by:
(a) Awarding a grant;
(b) Entering into a contract, intergovernmental agreement or other legal agreement; or
(c) Passing through moneys based on state or federal law or legal agreement.
(3) This section  applies to moneys received from the federal government or its agencies,
moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly or any other moneys  appropriated or allo-
cated to the department.
SECTION 4.
The Early Learning System Director and the Director of Human Services
may delegate to each other by interagency agreement any duties,  functions or powers
granted to the Department of Early Learning and Care  or the Department of Human Ser-
vices, as the  directors deem necessary for the efficient and effective operation of the re-
spective functions of the departments, including:
(1) Eligibility determinations for programs established under either department.
(2) Administrative proceedings, including contested case hearings and judicial reviews.
(3) The authority to make or receive payments.
(4) The recovery of erroneous payments or of overpayments.
SECTION 5.
(1) The  Department of Early Learning and Care may enter into agreements
governing the custody,  use and preservation of the records, papers, files and communications
of the department in accordance with  applicable privacy laws. The use of the records, papers,
files and communications is limited to the purposes for which they are furnished and  by the
provisions of law under which they may be furnished.
(2) The records, papers, files and communications of  the Department of Early Learning
and Care may be maintained in  a single or combined data system accessible to the Depart-
ment of Early Learning and Care and  to the Department of Human Services, the Department
of Education or any other state agency, subject to mutual agreement, for the administration
of programs and  the coordination of functions shared by the Department of Early Learning
and Care and the other state agency.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 279A.050, as amended by section 17, chapter 631, Oregon  Laws 2021, is
amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 427 (SB 427-INTRO) Page 2
279A.050. (1)(a) Except as otherwise provided  in the Public Contracting Code, a contracting
agency  shall  exercise all of the contracting agency’s procurement authority in accordance with the
provisions of the Public Contracting Code.
(b) If a contracting agency  has authority under this section to carry out functions described in
this section, or has authority to make procurements under a provision of law other than  the Public
Contracting Code, the contracting agency need not exercise the contracting agency’s authority in
accordance with the provisions of the code if, under ORS 279A.025,  the code does not apply to the
contract or contracting agency.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise  provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection and the Public Con-
tracting Code, for state agencies the Director of the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services
has all the authority available to carry out the provisions of the Public Contracting Code.
(b) Except  as otherwise provided in the Public Contracting Code, for state agencies the director
may delegate to  the State Chief Information Officer the authority to procure or supervise the pro-
curement of all goods, services and personal services related to information technology  and tele-
communications for state contracting agencies. This paragraph does  not apply to contracts under
which the contractor delivers to the state agency information technology products  or services inci-
dentally in performing a personal  services contract described in ORS chapter 279C or a construction
contract described in ORS chapter 279C.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in the Public Contracting Code, the Director  of Transportation
has all the authority available to:
(a) Procure  or supervise the procurement of all services and personal services to construct, ac-
quire, plan, design, maintain and operate passenger terminal  facilities and motor vehicle parking
facilities in connection with any public transportation system in accordance with ORS 184.689 (5);
(b) Procure  or supervise the procurement of all goods, services, public improvements and per-
sonal services that relate to operating, maintaining or constructing highways, bridges and  other
transportation facilities that are subject to the authority of the Department of Transportation; and
(c) Establish standards for,  prescribe forms for and conduct the prequalification of prospective
bidders on public improvement contracts that relate to  operating, maintaining or constructing
highways, bridges and other transportation  facilities that are subject to the authority of the De-
partment of Transportation.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in the Public Contracting Code, the Secretary of State has  all
the authority to procure or supervise the procurement of goods, services and personal services  re-
lated to programs under the authority of the Secretary of State.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in the  Public Contracting Code, the State Treasurer has all the
authority to procure or supervise the procurement of goods, services and  personal services related
to programs under the authority of the State Treasurer.
(6) The state agencies listed in this subsection have all the authority to do the following  in ac-
cordance with the Public Contracting Code:
(a) The Department of  Human Services to procure or supervise the procurement of goods, ser-
vices  and personal services under ORS 179.040 for the department’s institutions and the procurement
of goods, services and personal services for  constructing, demolishing, exchanging, maintaining, op-
erating and equipping housing for the purpose of  providing care to individuals with intellectual
disabilities or other developmental disabilities, subject to applicable provisions of ORS 427.335;
(b) The Oregon Health Authority  to procure or supervise the procurement of goods, services and
personal services under ORS 179.040 and construction materials, equipment and  supplies for the
authority’s institutions and the procurement of goods, services, personal services, construction ma-
terials, equipment and  supplies for constructing, demolishing, exchanging, maintaining, operating
and equipping housing for individuals with chronic mental illness, subject to  applicable provisions
of ORS 426.504;
(c) The State Department of Fish  and Wildlife to procure or supervise the procurement of con-
struction materials, equipment, supplies, services and personal services  for public improvements,
Enrolled Senate Bill 427 (SB 427-INTRO) Page 3
public works or ordinary construction described in ORS 279C.320  that is subject to the authority
of the State Department of Fish and Wildlife;
(d) The State Parks and Recreation  Department to procure or supervise the procurement of all
goods, services, public improvements and personal services related to state parks;
(e) The Oregon Department of Aviation to procure or supervise the  procurement of construction
materials, equipment,  supplies, services and personal services for public improvements, public works
or ordinary construction described in ORS 279C.320 that is subject to the authority of  the Oregon
Department of Aviation;
(f) The Oregon Business Development Department to procure or supervise the procurement  of
all goods, services, personal services and public improvements related to its foreign trade offices
operating outside the state;
(g) The Housing and Community Services Department to  procure or supervise the procurement
of goods, services and personal services as provided in ORS 279A.025 (2)(o);
(h) The Department of Corrections  to procure or supervise the procurement of construction
materials, equipment,  supplies, services and personal services for public improvements, public works
or ordinary construction described in ORS 279C.320 that is subject to the authority of the Depart-
ment of Corrections;
(i) The Department of Corrections, subject to any applicable provisions of ORS 279A.120,
279A.125, 279A.145 and  283.110 to 283.395, to procure or supervise the procurement of goods, ser-
vices and personal services under ORS 179.040 for its institutions;
(j) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs to  procure or supervise the procurement of real estate
broker and principal real estate broker services related to programs under the department’s au-
thority;
(k) The Oregon Military Department to procure or supervise the  procurement of construction
materials, equipment,  supplies, services and personal services for public improvements, public works
or ordinary construction  described in ORS 279C.320 that is subject to the authority of the Oregon
Military  Department;
(L) The Department of Education, subject to any applicable provisions of ORS  329.075, 329.085
and 329.485 and the federal Every  Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95, 129 Stat. 1802), to procure or
supervise the procurement  of goods, services, personal services and information technology related
to student assessment;
(m) The  Department of Early Learning and Care to procure or supervise the procurement of
goods, services, personal services and information technology related  to [ early childhood ] the au-
thority of the department or the Early Learning Council ; and
(n) Any state agency to conduct a procurement when the agency is specifically authorized by
any provision of law other than the Public Contracting Code to enter into a contract.
(7)(a) Notwithstanding this section and  ORS 279A.140 (1), the Director of the Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services has exclusive authority, unless the director delegates  the authority,
to procure or supervise the procurement of all price agreements  on behalf of the state agencies
identified in subsection (6) of this section under which more than one  state agency may order goods,
services or personal services.
(b) The director may delegate to  the State Chief Information Officer the exclusive authority to
procure or supervise the procurement  of all price agreements related to information technology and
telecommunications on behalf of the state agencies identified in subsection (6)  of this section.
Notwithstanding any authority that a state agency may have under subsection (3) or (6)  of this
section,  the  state agency may not establish a price agreement or enter into a contract for goods,
services or personal services  without the approval of the director or the State Chief Information
Officer if the director or the State Chief Information Officer has established a  price agreement for
the goods, services or personal services.
(c) The State Chief  Information Officer may review any solicitation document for procuring in-
formation technology or telecommunications that a state agency  intends to issue before the state
agency issues the  solicitation document and may require the state agency to name the State Chief
Enrolled Senate Bill 427 (SB 427-INTRO) Page 4
Information Officer as a third-party beneficiary with full authority to enforce the terms and condi-
tions of any public contract for information technology or telecommunications. The State Chief In-
formation Officer must approve a state agency’s procurement for information technology  or
telecommunications if the procurement has an anticipated contract price of  $1 million or more. The
State Chief Information Officer may require the state agency  to name the State Chief Information
Officer as the contracting party on behalf of  the State of Oregon in a procurement for information
technology or telecommunications that has an anticipated contract price of $1 million or more.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 326.432 is amended to read:
326.432. (1) The  Department of Early Learning and Care is under the supervision and control
of the Early Learning System Director, who is responsible for the performance of the duties,  func-
tions and powers of the department.
(2) The director  shall be appointed by the Governor and serves at the pleasure of the Governor.
(3) The director shall receive such salary as may be provided by law or, if not  so provided, as
may be fixed by the Governor, and shall be reimbursed for all expenses actually and necessarily
incurred by the director in the performance of official duties.
(4) Subject to any applicable provisions of ORS chapter 240, the director shall appoint all sub-
ordinate officers and employees of the department, prescribe their  duties and fix their compensation.
(5) The director may apply for, receive and accept grants, gifts or other  payments, including
property or services from any governmental or other  public or private person, and may make ar-
rangement to use the receipts, including for undertaking special studies  and other projects that re-
late to the costs of child care and access to child care.
(6) The director may delegate any duty, function or power  of the director to a subordi-
nate employee, unless otherwise prohibited by law or rule.
SECTION 8.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by Senate February 21, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House April 14, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 427 (SB 427-INTRO) Page 5